Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.36.030

Deputies—Exemptions.

This chapter shall not be construed to require the appointment of deputy finance officers or deputy city clerks of code cities to be made in accordance with this chapter insofar as concerns signatures or other acts which may lawfully be made or done by such deputy officer under the provisions of any other law.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.36.030.]